Florida, session 2026, SB1250.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 760.11, 12 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 13 760.11âAdministrative and civil remedies; construction.â 14 (1)âAny person aggrieved by a violation of ss. 760.01 15 760.10 may file a complaint with the commission within 365 days 16 after of the alleged violation, naming the employer, employment 17 agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee, 18 or, in the case of an alleged violation of s. 760.10(5), the 19 person responsible for the violation and describing the 20 violation. Any person aggrieved by a violation of s. 509.092 may 21 file a complaint with the commission within 365 days after of 22 the alleged violation, naming the person responsible for the 23 violation and describing the violation. The commission, a 24 commissioner, or the Attorney General may in like manner file 25 such a complaint. On the same day the complaint is filed with 26 the commission, the commission shall clearly stamp on the face 27 of the complaint the date the complaint was filed with the 28 commission. In lieu of filing the complaint with the commission, 29 a complaint under this section may be filed with the federal 30 Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or with any unit of 31 government of the state which is a fair-employment-practice 32 agency under 29 C.F.R. ss. 1601.70-1601.80. If the date the 33 complaint is filed is clearly stamped on the face of the 34 complaint, that date is the date of filing. The date the 35 complaint is filed with the commission for purposes of this 36 section is the earliest date of filing with the Equal Employment 37 Opportunity Commission, the fair-employment-practice agency, or 38 the commission. The complaint must shall contain a short and 39 plain statement of the facts describing the violation and the 40 relief sought. The commission may require additional information 41 to be in the complaint. The commission, within 5 days after of 42 the complaint being filed, shall by registered mail send a copy 43 of the complaint to the person who allegedly committed the 44 violation. The person who allegedly committed the violation may 45 file an answer to the complaint within 25 days after of the date 46 the complaint was filed with the commission. Any answer filed 47 must shall be mailed to the aggrieved person by the person 48 filing the answer. Both the complaint and the answer must shall 49 be verified. 50 (3)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), the commission 51 shall investigate the allegations in the complaint. Within 180 52 days after of the filing of the complaint, the commission shall 53 determine whether if there is reasonable cause to believe that 54 discriminatory practice has occurred in violation of the Florida 55 Civil Rights Act of 1992. When the commission determines whether 56 or not there is reasonable cause, the commission by registered 57 mail shall promptly notify the aggrieved person and the 58 respondent of the reasonable cause determination, the date of 59 such determination, and the options available under this 60 section. 61 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.